public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.aff
FLAG UTF-8
# vèrbi -ér
# themeT1 + r/bE
# themeT8 + o/bJL
# themeT9 + ime/gH
SFX b Y 461
SFX b er àrmene/G er
SFX b er é/FP er
SFX b er éa/JLPR er
SFX b er éami/K er
SFX b er éau/Q er
SFX b er éeƚo/B er
SFX b er ée/JL er
SFX b er éelo/B er
SFX b er éemi/K er
SFX b er éi/NP er
SFX b er éimo/L er
SFX b er éimoi/M er
SFX b er éitu/O er
SFX b er émoi/M er
SFX b er éndome/G er
SFX b er éo/JL er
SFX b er éomi/K er
SFX b er ésimo er
SFX b er éu/Q er
SFX b er évami/K er
SFX b er évau/Q er
SFX b er éveƚo/B er
SFX b er évelo/B er
SFX b er évemi/K er
SFX b er évimo/L er
SFX b er évimoi/M er
SFX b er évitu/O er
SFX b er évomi/K er
SFX b er í/FP er
SFX b er ímoi/M er
SFX b er íu/Q er
SFX b er ú er
SFX b er úo/B er
SFX b er arà/JLNR er
SFX b er aràe/R er
SFX b er arè/JL er
SFX b er arèmi/K er
SFX b er aré/P er
SFX b er arémoi/M er
SFX b er arésimo/L er
SFX b er arésimoi/M er
SFX b er aréu/Q er
SFX b er arí/P er
SFX b er aría/JLNR er
SFX b er aríami/K er
SFX b er aríatu/O er
SFX b er aríeƚo/B er
SFX b er aríe/JLR er
SFX b er aríelo/B er
SFX b er aríemi/K er
SFX b er arímoi/M er
SFX b er aríu/Q er
SFX b er arò/JL er
SFX b er aròmi/K er
SFX b er araƚo/B er
SFX b er aralo/B er
SFX b er arami/K er
SFX b er aratu/O er
SFX b er arave/RS er
SFX b er aremo/L er
SFX b er aren/L er
SFX b er areni/M er
SFX b er arense er
SFX b er aresi/P er
SFX b er aresiu/Q er
SFX b er arié/P er
SFX b er ariéu/Q er
SFX b er arimo/L er
SFX b er arion/L er
SFX b er arioni/M er
SFX b er arionse er
SFX b er arisen/L er
SFX b er ariseni/M er
SFX b er arisense er
SFX b er arisié/P er
SFX b er arisiéu/Q er
SFX b er arision/L er
SFX b er arisioni/M er
SFX b er arisionse er
SFX b er arison/L er
SFX b er arisoni/M er
SFX b er arisonse er
SFX b er aron/L er
SFX b er aroni/M er
SFX b er aronse er
SFX b er en/L er
SFX b er ene er
SFX b er eni/M er
SFX b er ense er
SFX b er erà/JLNR er
SFX b er eràe/R er
SFX b er erè/JL er
SFX b er erèmi/K er
SFX b er eré/P er
SFX b er erémoi/M er
SFX b er erésimo/L er
SFX b er erésimoi/M er
SFX b er eréu/Q er
SFX b er erí/P er
SFX b er ería/JLNR er
SFX b er eríami/K er
SFX b er eríatu/O er
SFX b er eríeƚo/B er
SFX b er eríe/JLR er
SFX b er eríelo/B er
SFX b er eríemi/K er
SFX b er erímoi/M er
SFX b er eríu/Q er
SFX b er erò/JL er
SFX b er eròmi/K er
SFX b er eraƚo/B er
SFX b er eralo/B er
SFX b er erami/K er
SFX b er eratu/O er
SFX b er erave/RS er
SFX b er eremo/L er
SFX b er eren/L er
SFX b er ereni/M er
SFX b er erense er
SFX b er eresi/P er
SFX b er eresiu/Q er
SFX b er erié/P er
SFX b er eriéu/Q er
SFX b er erimo/L er
SFX b er erion/L er
SFX b er erioni/M er
SFX b er erionse er
SFX b er erisen/L er
SFX b er eriseni/M er
SFX b er erisense er
SFX b er erisié/P er
SFX b er erisiéu/Q er
SFX b er erision/L er
SFX b er erisioni/M er
SFX b er erisionse er
SFX b er erison/L er
SFX b er erisoni/M er
SFX b er erisonse er
SFX b er eron/L er
SFX b er eroni/M er
SFX b er eronse er
SFX b er ié/P er
SFX b er iéu/Q er
SFX b er iede/P er
SFX b er iege/P er
SFX b er ime/H er
SFX b er imo/L er
SFX b er ion/L [^cijɉñ]er
SFX b er on/L [cijɉñ]er
SFX b er ione [^cijɉñ]er
SFX b er one [cijɉñ]er
SFX b er ioni/M [^cijɉñ]er
SFX b er oni/M [cijɉñ]er
SFX b er ionse [^cijɉñ]er
SFX b er onse [cijɉñ]er
SFX b er isen/L er
SFX b er isene er
SFX b er iseni/M er
SFX b er isense er
SFX b er isié/P er
SFX b er isiede/P er
SFX b er isiege/P er
SFX b er ision/L er
SFX b er isione er
SFX b er isioni/M er
SFX b er isionse er
SFX b er ison/L er
SFX b er isone er
SFX b er isoni/M er
SFX b er isonse er
SFX b er iven/L er
SFX b er iveni/M er
SFX b er ivense er
SFX b er ivié/P er
SFX b er iviéu/Q er
SFX b er ivion/L er
SFX b er ivioni/M er
SFX b er ivionse er
SFX b er ivon/L er
SFX b er ivoni/M er
SFX b er ivonse er
SFX b er udo/B er
SFX b r de er
SFX b r ge er
SFX b r me/H er
SFX b r mo/L er
SFX b r n/L er
SFX b r ndo/E er
SFX b r ne er
SFX b r ni/M er
SFX b r nte er
SFX b r rà/JLNR er
SFX b r ràe/R er
SFX b r rè/JL er
SFX b r rèmi/K er
SFX b r ré/P er
SFX b r rémoi/M er
SFX b r résimo/L er
SFX b r résimoi/M er
SFX b r réu/Q er
SFX b r rí/P er
SFX b r ría/JLNR er
SFX b r ríami/K er
SFX b r ríatu/O er
SFX b r ríeƚo/B er
SFX b r ríe/JLR er
SFX b r ríelo/B er
SFX b r ríemi/K er
SFX b r rímoi/M er
SFX b r ríu/Q er
SFX b r rò/JL er
SFX b r ròmi/K er
SFX b r raƚo/B er
SFX b r ralo/B er
SFX b r rami/K er
SFX b r ratu/O er
SFX b r rave/RS er
SFX b r re er
SFX b r remo/L er
SFX b r ren/L er
SFX b r reni/M er
SFX b r rense er
SFX b r resi/P er
SFX b r resiu/Q er
SFX b r rié/P er
SFX b r riéu/Q er
SFX b r rimo/L er
SFX b r rion/L er
SFX b r rioni/M er
SFX b r rionse er
SFX b r risen/L er
SFX b r riseni/M er
SFX b r risense er
SFX b r risié/P er
SFX b r risiéu/Q er
SFX b r rision/L er
SFX b r risioni/M er
SFX b r risionse er
SFX b r rison/L er
SFX b r risoni/M er
SFX b r risonse er
SFX b r rme/G er
SFX b r ron/L er
SFX b r roni/M er
SFX b r ronse er
SFX b r se/I er
SFX b r si er
SFX b r sto/BI er
SFX b r va/JLPR er
SFX b r ve/JL er
SFX b r vi/NP er
SFX b r vo/JL er
SFX b o a dò[lƚ]o
SFX b o e/IJLR dò[lƚ]o
SFX b o i/FN dò[lƚ]o
SFX b o o/JL dò[lƚ]o
SFX b o a pòso
SFX b o e/IJLR pòso
SFX b o i/FN pòso
SFX b o o/JL pòso
SFX b der rà/JLNR poder
SFX b der ràe/R poder
SFX b der rè/JL poder
SFX b der rèmi/K poder
SFX b der ré/P poder
SFX b der rémoi/M poder
SFX b der résimo/L poder
SFX b der résimoi/M poder
SFX b der réu/Q poder
SFX b der rí/P poder
SFX b der ría/JLNR poder
SFX b der ríami/K poder
SFX b der ríatu/O poder
SFX b der ríeƚo/B poder
SFX b der ríe/JLR poder
SFX b der ríelo/B poder
SFX b der ríemi/K poder
SFX b der rímoi/M poder
SFX b der ríu/Q poder
SFX b der rò/JL poder
SFX b der ròmi/K poder
SFX b der raƚo/B poder
SFX b der ralo/B poder
SFX b der rami/K poder
SFX b der ratu/O poder
SFX b der rave/RS poder
SFX b der remo/L poder
SFX b der ren/L poder
SFX b der reni/M poder
SFX b der rense poder
SFX b der resi/P poder
SFX b der resiu/Q poder
SFX b der rié/P poder
SFX b der riéu/Q poder
SFX b der rimo/L poder
SFX b der rion/L poder
SFX b der rioni/M poder
SFX b der rionse poder
SFX b der risen/L poder
SFX b der riseni/M poder
SFX b der risense poder
SFX b der risié/P poder
SFX b der risiéu/Q poder
SFX b der rision/L poder
SFX b der risioni/M poder
SFX b der risionse poder
SFX b der rison/L poder
SFX b der risoni/M poder
SFX b der risonse poder
SFX b der ron/L poder
SFX b der roni/M poder
SFX b der ronse poder
SFX b do ƚe/IR pòdo
SFX b do le/IR pòdo
SFX b o a pòdo
SFX b o e/IJLR pòdo
SFX b o i/N pòdo
SFX b o o/JL pòdo
SFX b o a pòo
SFX b o e/IJLR pòo
SFX b o i/N pòo
SFX b o o/JL pòo
SFX b aver ò/JL saver
SFX b aver òmi/K saver
SFX b aver eme/H saver
SFX b ver ƚo/B saver
SFX b ver lo/B saver
SFX b ver piè saver
SFX b ver pié saver
SFX b ver pi saver
SFX b ver pia saver
SFX b ver pie saver
SFX b ver piede saver
SFX b ver piege saver
SFX b ver piemo saver
SFX b ver pien saver
SFX b ver piene saver
SFX b ver piga saver
SFX b ver pigi saver
SFX b ver pii saver
SFX b ver pion saver
SFX b ver pione saver
SFX b ver tu/O saver
SFX b ao à/FNR sao
SFX b o e/JL sao
SFX b o o/JL sao
SFX b o a vò[lƚ]o
SFX b o e/IJLR vò[lƚ]o
SFX b o i/FN vò[lƚ]o
SFX b o o/JL vò[lƚ]o
SFX b lo ga tòlo
SFX b lo gi tòlo
SFX b lo go/JL tòlo
SFX b lo gomi/K tòlo
SFX b lo r/E tòlo
SFX b lo re tòlo
SFX b lo rme/G tòlo
SFX b o a tòlo
SFX b o e/IJLR tòlo
SFX b o ga tòlo
SFX b o gi tòlo
SFX b o i/FN tòlo
SFX b o o/JL tòlo
SFX b o to/BI tòlo
SFX b o a tòƚo
SFX b o e/IJLR tòƚo
SFX b o ga tòƚo
SFX b o gi tòƚo
SFX b o i/FN tòƚo
SFX b o o/JL tòƚo
SFX b aver epiè aver
SFX b aver epié aver
SFX b aver epiede aver
SFX b aver epiege aver
SFX b aver epiemo aver
SFX b aver epien aver
SFX b aver epiene aver
SFX b aver epion aver
SFX b aver epione aver
SFX b aver ga/R aver
SFX b aver geƚo/B aver
SFX b aver gelo/B aver
SFX b ào à/FJLNR ào
SFX b ào è/JL ào
SFX b ào èpi ào
SFX b ào èpia ào
SFX b ào èpie ào
SFX b ào ò/JL ào
SFX b er éndoge ‘ver
SFX b r ndo ‘ver
SFX b ver biàndoge ‘ver
SFX b ver biando ‘ver
SFX b ver é/P aver
SFX b ver émoi/M aver
SFX b ver éu/Q aver
SFX b ver í/P aver
