public_html/app/tools/lang/data/dict-vec-oxt/dictionaries/ved.dic
ào/bJL
‘véo/bJL
‘ver/bE
aer/bE
aver/bE
dòlo/bJL
doƚer/bE
doƚo/bJL
doler/bE
koñer/bE
koño/bJL
konparer/bE
konparo/bJL
malvòlo/bJL
malvoƚer/bE
malvoƚo/bJL
malvoler/bE
pòdo/bJL
pòo/bJL
pòso/bJL
parer/bE
parmaner/bE
parmano/bJL
paro/bJL
permaner/bE
permano/bJL
poder/bE
poer/bE
poser/bE
prevaƚer/bE
prevaƚo/bJL
prevaler/bE
prevalo/bJL
reào/bJL
reaer/bE
reaver/bE
remaner/bE
remano/bJL
retòlo/bJL
retoƚer/bE
retoƚo/bJL
retoler/bE
revòlo/bJL
revoƚer/bE
revoƚo/bJL
revoler/bE
sào/bJL
saer/bE
sao/bJL
saver/bE
soƚer/bE
soƚo/bJL
soler/bE
solo/bJL
sprevaƚer/bE
sprevaƚo/bJL
sprevaler/bE
sprevalo/bJL
strasào/bJL
strasaer/bE
strasaver/bE
tòlo/bJL
toƚer/bE
toƚo/bJL
toler/bE
vòlo/bJL
vaƚer/bE
vaƚo/bJL
valer/bE
valo/bJL
voƚer/bE
voƚo/bJL
voler/bE
